Arkansas, session 2025, SB235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 11, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 7 — Voluntary Portable Benefit Account Act

11-4-701. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Voluntary
Portable Benefit Account Act".

11-4-702. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Bank" means a state bank or a national bank or an out-
of-state state-chartered bank that has received a certificate of authority
under § 23-48-1001.
(B) "Bank" shall also include any foreign bank organized
under the laws of a territory of the United States, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, or the United States Virgin Islands, the
deposits of which are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;
*ANS091*
02/14/2025 9:47:30 AM ANS091

SB235
(2) "Hiring party" means a person who hires or enters into a
contract with an independent contractor;
(3)(A) "Voluntary portable benefit account" means an account
that is:
(i) Opened by an independent contractor to fund the
purchase of one (1) or more benefit plans;
(ii) Administered by a voluntary portable benefit
account provider; and
(iii) Assigned to a beneficiary of one (1) or more
benefit plans rather than to an employer or hiring party.
(B) "Voluntary portable benefit plan" includes without
limitation:
(i) Health insurance;
(ii) Income replacement insurance;
(iii) Life insurance; and
(iv) Retirement benefits; and
(4) "Voluntary portable benefit account provider" means the
administrator of a voluntary portable benefit account and includes:
(A) A bank;
(B) An investment management firm;
(C) A technology provider or program manager that offers
services through a bank or investment management firm; or
(D) Any other person who demonstrates to the satisfaction
of the Bank Commissioner that the manner in which the bank or person will
administer the voluntary portable benefit account will be consistent with the
voluntary portable benefit account requirements under this subchapter.

11-4-703. Voluntary portable benefit account.
(a)(1) A person or entity, including an independent contractor or an
internet- or application-based company, may voluntarily contribute funds to a
voluntary portable benefit account for an independent contractor.
(2) Employment status as an independent contractor shall be
determined by the employment status factors set out in the Empower
Independent Contractors Act of 2019, § 11-1-201 et seq.
(3) A contribution to a voluntary portable benefit account shall
not be used as a criterion for determining a worker’s employment
02/14/2025 9:47:30 AM ANS091

SB235
classification.
(b) A contribution to a voluntary portable benefit account may be made
using the funds of the hiring party or a percentage of funds withheld from
compensation owed to an independent contractor if:
(1) The withholding of compensation is expressly agreed to in
writing;
(2) The written agreement is clear, unambiguous, and prominently
displayed either in a work contract or a separate notice;
(3) The withholdings are voluntary and require an independent
contractor to opt in; and
(4) An independent contractor may choose to opt out of the
agreement in subdivision (b)(2) of this section at any time.
























02/14/2025 9:47:30 AM ANS091